Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2419
Informal probate; notice; requirements.

The moving party must give notice as described by section 30-2220 of his application for informal probate (1) to any person demanding it pursuant to section 30-2413; and (2) to any personal representative of the decedent whose appointment has not been terminated. No other notice of informal probate is required, except as provided in sections 30-2415(b) and 30-2420(c).

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 97, UPC § 3-306.